Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-174.09
Board of zoning appeals; powers; duties.

There may be created a board of zoning appeals comprised of five members appointed by the county board, which board shall have power to hear and decide appeals from any decision or order of the building inspector or other officers charged with the enforcement of the zoning resolution in those cases where it is alleged that such decision or order is in error. The board shall also have power to decide upon petitions for variances and, subject to such standards and procedures as the county board may provide in the zoning resolution, to vary the strict application of the height, area, parking, or density requirements to the extent necessary to permit the owner a reasonable use of his land in those specific instances where there are peculiar, exceptional, and unusual circumstances in connection with a specific parcel of land, which circumstances are not generally found within the locality or neighborhood concerned. The board may also have such related duties as the county board may assign. The county board may provide for appeals from a decision of the board.

Laws 1961, c. 87, § 14, p. 307.

For authorization to act for cities of the second class and villages, see section 84-155.